Utah statutes.
63B-8-502.   Other capital facility authorizations and intent language.

(1)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:

(a)  Salt Lake Community College use institutional funds to plan, design, and construct an addition to the Student Activity Center at the Redwood Campus under the direction of the director of the Division of Facilities Construction and Management unless supervisory authority has been delegated; and

(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project.

(2)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:

(a)  Salt Lake Community College use institutional funds to plan, design, and construct the Student Activity Center at the Jordan Campus under the direction of the director of the Division of Facilities Construction and Management unless supervisory authority has been delegated; and

(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project.

(3)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:

(a)  Southern Utah University use institutional funds to plan, design, and construct the Shakespearean Festival Scene Shop under the direction of the director of the Division of Facilities Construction and Management unless supervisory authority has been delegated; and

(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project.

(4)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:

(a)  the University of Utah plan, design, and construct a new East Campus Central Plant under the direction of the director of the Division of Facilities Construction and Management unless supervisory authority has been delegated;

(b)  the project may be financed through a third party to the extent that energy savings resulting from the project are used to pay the annual debt service; and

(c)  the University of Utah obtains the approval of the Board of Regents before entering into a financing arrangement.

(5)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:

(a)  the University of Utah use institutional funds to plan, design, and construct a pedestrian bridge over Wasatch Drive under the direction of the director of the Division of Facilities Construction and Management unless supervisory authority has been delegated; and

(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project.

(6)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:

(a)  Utah State University use institutional funds to plan, design, and construct an addition to the Nora Eccles Harrison Museum of Art under the direction of the director of the Division of Facilities Construction and Management unless supervisory authority has been delegated;

(b)  no state funds be used for the design and construction of this project; and

(c)  the university may request state funds for operations and maintenance to the extent it is able to demonstrate to the Board of Regents that the project meets approved academic and training purposes under Board of Regents policy R710.

(7)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:

(a)  Utah State University use institutional funds to plan, design, and construct a renovation and expansion of the Lyric Theater under the direction of the director of the Division of Facilities Construction and Management unless supervisory authority has been delegated;

(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project; and

(c)  the university may request state funds for operations and maintenance to the extent it is able to demonstrate to the Board of Regents that the project meets approved academic and training purposes under Board of Regents policy R710.

(8)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:

(a)  the University of Utah use institutional funds to plan, design, and construct an expansion of the Pioneer Memorial Theater under the direction of the director of the Division of Facilities Construction and Management unless supervisory authority has been delegated;

(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project; and

(c)  the university may request state funds for operations and maintenance to the extent it is able to demonstrate to the Board of Regents that the project meets approved academic and training purposes under Board of Regents policy R710.

(9)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:

(a)  the University of Utah use institutional funds to plan, design, and construct a new building with associated parking for the College of Pharmacy under the direction of the director of the Division of Facilities Construction and Management unless supervisory authority has been delegated;

(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project; and

(c)  the university may request state funds for operations and maintenance to the extent that the university is able to demonstrate to the Board of Regents that the project meets approved academic and training purposes under Board of Regents policy R710.

(10)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:

(a)  Weber State University use institutional funds to plan, design, and construct a Visual Arts Building under the direction of the director of the Division of Facilities Construction and Management unless supervisory authority has been delegated;

(b)  no state funds be used for the construction of this project; and

(c)  consideration be given to appropriating state funds for the increased operation and maintenance costs associated with academic programs and associated support.

(11)  It is the intent of the Legislature that the Department of Corrections use federal funds to plan, design, and construct a 300 bed minimum security facility in Draper under the direction of the director of the Division of Facilities Construction and Management unless supervisory authority has been delegated.

(12)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:

(a)  the Department of Transportation pursue the sale of property located adjacent to the Region One Headquarters in Ogden; and

(b)  the Department of Transportation only expend those funds, up to the amount collected, to expand the current Region One Headquarters Building.

(13)  It is the intent of the Legislature that the State Hospital be allowed to use available funding, up to $100,000, to purchase the property adjacent to the Provo campus.

(14)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:

(a)  Dixie College use institutional funds to plan, design, and construct a satellite campus building under the direction of the director of the Division of Facilities Construction and Management unless supervisory authority has been delegated;

(b)  no state funds be used for the construction of this project; and

(c)  consideration be given to appropriating state funds for the increased operation and maintenance costs associated with academic programs and associated support.



Amended by Chapter 169, 2006 General Session

